Tennessee statutes. Title 3 Legislature
Part 1

Office of Program Evaluation

3-14-101. Creation — Duties.

There is created an office of program evaluation within the general assembly which has the duty to:

Systematically evaluate, on an appropriate schedule, all programs conducted under the control or auspices of state government;

Evaluate programs of local government as directed by resolution of either house of the general assembly or by joint resolution;

Furnish to the members of the general assembly reports of the findings of its evaluative studies of state or local governmental programs, agencies, and departments;

Prepare, in conjunction with the office of legal services for the general assembly, and distribute legislation which would effectuate any statutory changes recommended in a report of an evaluative study;

Provide personnel to serve as committee staff or to assist the staff of any committee of either house of the general assembly which has program evaluation duties;

Assist committees and individual members of the general assembly in the evaluation of state and local governmental programs; and

Fulfill any other functions specified by law or assigned by any committee of the general assembly and approved by the appropriate speaker.

Acts 1977, ch. 317, § 1; T.C.A., § 3-1401.

Cross-References. Reporting requirement satisfied by notice to general assembly members of publication of report, §3-1-114.

3-14-102. Director — Staff.

The joint legislative services committee shall appoint, subject to the approval of the speakers of the senate and the house of representatives, a director of program evaluation who shall have such training or experience in government as may be deemed necessary to perform the duties of the office. The director and other personnel shall be chosen without reference to party affiliation but solely on the basis of fitness to perform the duties of the office. The committee shall determine the compensation of the director, while the compensation of other personnel shall be determined by the committee upon recommendation of the director. Personnel shall be employed upon recommendation of the director with approval of the speakers.

Acts 1977, ch. 317, § 2; T.C.A., § 3-1402.

3-14-103. Office space — Facilities.

Suitable office space and facilities shall be provided in Nashville convenient to the general assembly.

Acts 1977, ch. 317, § 2; T.C.A., § 3-1403.

3-14-104. Scope of evaluations.

Evaluations performed by the office under the provisions of § 3-14-101 shall be based on standards and methods developed by the office with the assistance of appropriate committees of the general assembly. Evaluations shall focus on the degree to which the department or agency is efficiently fulfilling its statutory or executive order mandate.

The evaluations shall include, but are not limited to, a consideration of the following factors:

The degree of successful achievement of the purposes set out or implicit in the enabling statute or executive order;

The efficiency with which the program is being implemented;

Any alternative methods by which other jurisdictions are attempting to achieve the same or similar program goals; and

The results of published and unpublished studies of various alternative methods of accomplishing the program of the department or agency.

Acts 1977, ch. 317, § 3; T.C.A., § 3-1404.

3-14-105. Reports.

Evaluative reports prepared by the office shall include, but are not limited to:

Evaluation of the present program;

Evaluation of the implementation procedures; and

Recommendations on changes needed in the program, implementation, funding level, statutory authority, or department organization.

Acts 1977, ch. 317, § 4; T.C.A., § 3-1405.

3-14-106. Division of advocacy — Duties.

The office of program evaluation shall have a permanent division of advocacy for the developmentally disabled which may perform, or contract for the performance of, those advocacy functions required by federal law. The division may receive and expend, through the office of program evaluation, such federal funds as are or may become available under federal law as well as any state funds appropriated for its purposes.

Acts 1977, ch. 317, § 5; T.C.A., § 3-1406.

3-14-107. Expenditure of funds.

The office of program evaluation shall have the authority to expend appropriated state funds and receive and expend available federal, foundation, or other funds.

Acts 1977, ch. 317, § 6; T.C.A., § 3-1407.

3-14-108. Coordination with other programs and governments.

The office of program evaluation shall coordinate its activities with those of all other legislative programs in order to avoid duplication of effort.

All documents, records, and other information of state and local governments shall be made available to the office upon request. All facilities of state and local government shall be open to the office upon request.

No action of the office shall violate appropriate state or federal privacy legislation.

Acts 1977, ch. 317, § 7; T.C.A., § 3-1408.

3-14-109. Records are public — Exceptions.

All books, papers, records, and correspondence pertaining to the work of the office are public records except:

Intraoffice memoranda made by the director or the director's staff;

Work papers and correspondence with any committee or member of the general assembly; and

Any material supplied to the office by a state or local government agency or department which, under applicable law, would remain confidential in the hands of that agency or department.

Such papers and correspondence may become public records whenever the speakers shall so order.

The office has the authority to withhold from the public record any information supplied to the office or to a committee of the general assembly or a member of the general assembly by an individual who requests such confidentiality.

Acts 1977, ch. 317, § 8; T.C.A., § 3-1409.

Cross-References. Confidentiality of public records, §10-7-504.